Arkansas, session 2025, SB504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 60, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 16 — Arkansas Rural Preceptorship Program Act

6-60-1601. Title.
This subchapter shall be known as the “Arkansas Rural Preceptorship
Program Act”.

6-61-1602. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that there is a shortage of physicians
practicing within rural areas of the state.
(b) The General Assembly intends to support the creation of the
Arkansas Rural Preceptorship Program, which will:
(1) Combine the resources of public and private organizations;
(2) Introduce medical students to a rural community to let the
medical students experience the benefits of a rural community while raising a
family and practicing medicine;
*CRH289*
03/18/2025 1:33:24 PM CRH289

SB504
(3) Use a public-private partnership arrangement to assist rural
communities in attracting new physicians to the rural communities; and
(4) Provide funding for preceptorship programs in rural
communities.

6-60-1603. Arkansas Rural Preceptorship Program.
(a)(1) The Arkansas Rural Preceptorship Program is established to help
provide funding for preceptorship programs in rural communities throughout
the state.
(2) The program established under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section shall provide an opportunity for medical students to be placed in a
preceptorship at any participating clinic, hospital, federal qualified health
center, or other healthcare facility.
(b) The following institutions shall be eligible to participate in the
program:
(1) The University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences;
(2) The Arkansas College of Osteopathic Medicine;
(3) The New York Institute of Technology College of Osteopathic
Medicine at Arkansas State University; and
(4) The Alice L. Walton School of Medicine.
(c) The Division of Higher Education shall:
(1) Administer the program; and
(2) Release funding at the per diem rate to a participating
institution under subdivision (b) of this section to reimburse the
institution for any participating medical student for up to three (3) weeks
of placement in the program.
(d) Funding for the program under this section may be provided from
public or private funds.








03/18/2025 1:33:24 PM CRH289